Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 65 Guardians Generally
Subchapter 2

— Appointment

28-65-201. For whom guardian may be appointed.

A guardian of the estate may be appointed for any incapacitated person.

A guardian of the person may be appointed for any incapacitated person except a married minor who is incapacitated solely by reason of his or her minority.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-825.

28-65-202. Venue.

The venue for the appointment of a guardian shall be:

In the county of this state which is the domicile of the incapacitated person;

If the incapacitated person is not domiciled in this state, but resides in this state, then in the county of his or her residence; or

(1)If proceedings are commenced in more than one (1) county, they shall be stayed, except in the county where first commenced, until final determination of venue by the circuit court of the county where first commenced. If the proper venue is finally determined to be in another county, the court shall transmit the original file to the proper county.

The proceeding shall be deemed commenced by the filing of a petition, and the proceeding first legally commenced to appoint a guardian of the estate, or of the person and the estate, shall extend to all of the property of the incapacitated person in this state.

(1)If it appears to the court at any time before the termination of the guardianship that the proceeding was commenced in a county of improper venue, the court shall order the proceeding transferred to another circuit court.

If it appears that the residence of the ward or of the guardian has been changed to another county or, in case of guardianship of the estate, that a transfer would be for the best interest of the ward and his or her estate, then the court in its discretion may order the proceedings transferred to another circuit court.

However, in case of any transfer of proceedings, all pertinent papers, files, and certified copies of any court orders shall be transferred to the receiving court.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-826.

28-65-203. Qualifications of guardian.

(1)A natural person is qualified to be appointed guardian of the person and of the estate of an incapacitated person if he or she is:

Subject to the requirements in subdivision (a)(1) of this section, a convicted and unpardoned felon may:

When the major portion of the support of the minor is being supplied or administered by the organization;

When the court finds that:

If the department consents, the department is qualified for appointment as guardian of the estate of a minor when the minor is in the custody of the department.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-827; Acts 1993, No. 416, § 1; 2003, No. 1185, § 280; 2007, No. 862, § 3; 2009, No. 301, § 2; 2011, No. 1027, § 2; 2013, No. 1137, § 2; 2015, No. 1018, § 4; 2019, No. 833, § 1.

28-65-204. Preferences.

The parents of an unmarried minor, or either of them, if qualified and, in the opinion of the court, suitable, shall be preferred over all others for appointment as guardian of the person.

Subject to this rule, the court shall appoint as guardian of an incapacitated person the one most suitable who is willing to serve, having due regard to:

Any request contained in a will or other written instrument executed by the parent or by the legal custodian of a minor child for the appointment of a person as guardian of the minor child;

Any request for the appointment of a person as his or her guardian made by a minor fourteen (14) years of age or over;

Prior to the appointment of a guardian, the court shall take into consideration any request made by the incapacitated person concerning his or her preference regarding the person to be appointed guardian. This request may be made to the court by any means, but there shall be no necessity that the incapacitated person appear before the court for the purpose of indicating his or her preference.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-828; Acts 1991, No. 11, § 1.

28-65-205. Petition.

Any person may file a petition for the appointment of himself or herself or some other qualified person as guardian of an incapacitated person.

The petition shall state, insofar as can be ascertained:

The name, age, residence, and post office address of the incapacitated person;

The nature of incapacity and purpose of the guardianship sought in accordance with the classifications set forth in §28-65-104;

The approximate value and a description of the incapacitated person's property, including any compensation, pension, insurance, or allowance to which he or she may be entitled;

Whether there is, in any state, a guardian of the person or of the estate of the incompetent;

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-829.

28-65-206. Single guardianship for two or more incapacitated persons.

When an application is made for the appointment of a guardian for two (2) or more incapacitated persons who are children of a common parent, or are parent and child or are husband and wife, it shall not be necessary that a separate petition, bond, or other paper be filed for each incompetent, and the guardianship of all may be considered as one (1) proceeding except that the guardian shall maintain and file separate accounts for the estates of each of his or her wards.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-830.

28-65-207. Notice of hearing for appointment.

Notice of the hearing for the appointment of a guardian need not be given to any person:

Who has signed the petition;

Who has in writing waived notice of the hearing, except the alleged incapacitated person may not waive notice;

Who actually appears at the hearing;

Whose existence, relationship to the alleged incapacitated person, or whereabouts is unknown and cannot by the exercise of reasonable diligence be ascertained;

Other than the alleged incapacitated person, whom the court finds to be beyond the limits of the continental United States or himself or herself incompetent; or

The alleged incapacitated person if the court finds that he or she is detained or confined by a foreign power or has disappeared.

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, before the court shall appoint a guardian, other than a temporary guardian, notice of the hearing of the application for the appointment of the guardian shall be served upon the following:

The alleged incapacitated person if over fourteen (14) years of age, and the alleged incapacitated person shall be notified of his or her rights under § 28-65-213. This notice shall be served with the notice of hearing;

The parents of the alleged incapacitated person, if the alleged incapacitated person is a minor;

The spouse, if any, of the alleged incapacitated person;

Any other person who is the guardian of the person or of the estate of the alleged incapacitated person, or any other person who has the care and custody of the alleged incapacitated person, and the director of any agency from which the respondent is receiving services;

The Department of Human Services when the petition seeks appointment of a guardian who, at the time the petition is filed, serves as guardian of five (5) or more minor wards;

If there is neither a known parent nor known spouse, at least one (1) of the nearest competent relatives by blood or marriage of the alleged incapacitated person; and

If directed by the court:

Any department, bureau, agency, or political subdivision of the United States or of this state which makes or awards compensation, pension, insurance, or other allowance for the benefit of the ward or his or her estate;

Any department, bureau, agency, or political subdivision of the United States or of this state or any charitable organization, which may be charged with the supervision, control, or custody of the incompetent person; or

Any other person designated by the court.

If the incapacitated person is over fourteen (14) years of age, there shall be personal service upon him or her if personal service can be had. Service on others may be had in any manner provided by § 28-1-112(b) or (e).

The court, for good cause shown, may reduce the number of days of notice, but in every case at least twenty (20) days' notice shall be given.

It shall not be necessary that the person for whom guardianship is sought be represented by a guardian ad litem in the proceedings.

Proceedings for the appointment of a permanent guardian were not rendered invalid because of the lack of notice where the incompetent entered her appearance. Lester v. Pilkinton, 225 Ark. 349, 282 S.W.2d 590 (1955) (decision under prior law).

Where an original order appointing a guardian was void because it was issued without notice to the alleged incompetent and the guardianship was dismissed on a hearing on the merits, the guardian and his attorney could not be paid from the estate of the alleged incompetent. Powers v. Chisman, 217 Ark. 508, 231 S.W.2d 598 (1950) (decision under prior law).

Order appointing the mother's aunt and uncle guardian of the minor child was proper because the father's parents did not have standing to argue that the trial court erred in denying the father's motion to vacate; a U.S. Const. Amend. VI right to counsel was not cognizable in ordinary civil cases; subdivision (a)(3) of this section provided that notice need not be given to any person who actually appeared at the hearing; and there was no evidence that the trial court ignored the father's wishes, §28-65-204(b).Light v. Duvall, 2011 Ark. App. 535, 385 S.W.3d 399 (2011).

Where the brother of an incompetent knew of the appointment of the incompetent's stepdaughter, who stood in loco filiae with incompetent, as his guardian and wrote for and received copies of reports of the probate court, approvals of the probate court of first and second annual reports of guardian were not void because brother had not been served with formal copies of the reports. Metcalfe v. Nichol, 225 Ark. 574, 283 S.W.2d 853 (1955) (decision under prior law).

If a trial court exercised its discretion at an insanity hearing and barred an alleged incompetent from courtroom during part of the hearing, any abuse of such discretion was merely an error in exercise of jurisdiction, corrected only by appeal, and was not ground for granting a writ of injunction from further proceeding on a petition by the alleged incompetent. Wilson v. Williams, 215 Ark. 576, 221 S.W.2d 773 (1949) (decision under prior law).

Trial court at an insanity hearing had discretion in determining whether physical presence of an alleged incompetent was necessary at all times during the trial. Wilson v. Williams, 215 Ark. 576, 221 S.W.2d 773 (1949) (decision under prior law).

An alleged incompetent was not entitled to a writ of prohibition against trial court from further proceedings in insanity hearing on the grounds that the sheriff was not a proper person to act as guardian and that evidence was not sufficient to support the finding of insanity, as the grounds alleged involved only mere errors reviewable only on appeal, and not by a writ of prohibition. Wilson v. Williams, 215 Ark. 576, 221 S.W.2d 773 (1949) (decision under prior law).

Notice to the alleged incapacitated person was required prior to the appointment of a guardian of the person and the estate where none of the exceptions in subsection (a) to the notice requirement applied and the appointment was not temporary. Earle v. Bennett, 289 Ark. 448, 711 S.W.2d 829 (1986).

Mother lacked standing to challenge the guardianship petition based on the failure to serve the biological father or find him unfit.Reagan v. Dodson, 2016 Ark. App. 598, 509 S.W.3d 654 (2016).

Circuit court did not clearly err when it found that appellant's waiver of notice as written applied to “all proceedings” and that appellant did not intend it to be limited to only proceedings that involved the appointment of his parents as guardians to his children, as opposed to other persons; although appellant could have limited under the statute his waiver to waive notice only of specific hearings, he failed to do so.Paschall v. Paschall, 2018 Ark. App. 514, 563 S.W.3d 592 (2018).

Cited: Hooks v. Pratte, 53 Ark. App. 161, 920 S.W.2d 24 (1996); Finney v. Cook, 351 Ark. 367, 94 S.W.3d 333 (2002).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-831; Acts 1991, No. 163, § 2.

28-65-208. Notice of other hearings.

Whenever notice of a hearing in a guardianship proceeding is required, the notice shall be served upon the following who do not appear or in writing waive notice of hearing:

The guardian of the person;

The guardian of the estate; and

If directed by the court:

Any department, bureau, agency, or political subdivision of the United States or of this state which makes or awards compensation, pension, insurance, or other allowance for the benefit of the ward's estate;

Any department, bureau, agency, or political subdivision of the United States or of this state or any charitable organization, which may be charged with the supervision, control, or custody of the incapacitated person; or

Any other person whom the court may designate.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-832.

28-65-209. Request for special notice of hearings.

At any time after the issuance of letters of guardianship, any department, bureau, agency, or political subdivision of the United States or of this state which makes or awards compensation, pension, insurance, or other allowance for the benefit of the ward's estate; or any department, bureau, agency, or political subdivision of the United States or of this state, or any charitable organization, which may be charged with the supervision, control, or custody of the incapacitated person; or an interested person may serve, in person or by attorney, upon the guardian or upon his or her attorney and file with the clerk of the court where the proceedings are pending, with a written admission or proof of service, a written request stating that he or she desires written notice of all hearings on petitions for:

The settlements of accounts;

The sale, mortgage, lease, or exchange of any property of the estate;

An allowance of any nature payable from the ward's estate;

The investment of funds of the estate;

The removal, suspension, or discharge of the guardian or final termination of the guardianship; and

Any other matter affecting the welfare or care of the incapacitated person and his or her property.

The applicant for such a notice must include in his or her written request his or her post office address or that of his or her attorney.

Unless the court otherwise directs, upon filing the request, the person shall be entitled to notice of all such hearings or of such of them as he or she designates in his or her request.

Circuit court did not clearly err when it found that appellant's waiver of notice as written applied to “all proceedings” and that appellant did not intend it to be limited to only proceedings that involved the appointment of his parents as guardians to his children, as opposed to other persons; although appellant could have limited under the statute his waiver to waive notice only of specific hearings, he failed to do so.Paschall v. Paschall, 2018 Ark. App. 514, 563 S.W.3d 592 (2018).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-833.

28-65-210. Proof required for appointment of guardian.

Before appointing a guardian, the court must be satisfied that:

The person for whom a guardian is prayed is either a minor or otherwise incapacitated;

A guardianship is desirable to protect the interests of the incapacitated person; and

The person to be appointed guardian is qualified and suitable to act as such.

Former similar statute required only that after it was found that a guardianship was desirable to protect the interests of a minor, the person to be appointed guardian was qualified and suitable to act. Lee v. Grubbs, 269 Ark. 205, 599 S.W.2d 715 (1980) (decision under prior law).

Circuit court did not err in appointing a sister as guardian over her sibling, an incapacitated adult, without holding a hearing to determine the sister's qualifications or making specific factual findings regarding her suitability because the record did not indicate that the circuit court ever refused any request by the brother to hold an evidentiary hearing or issue findings of fact; nothing in §28-65-203 mandates a hearing or specific factual findings on the question of a guardian's ability to serve, and no such requirements are set forth in this section.Kuelbs v. Hill, 2010 Ark. App. 793, 379 S.W.3d 716 (2010), review denied, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Ark. LEXIS 284 (Ark. June 2, 2011).

Circuit court did not err when it failed to terminate the guardianship of a child by the child's paternal aunt and uncle and to establish the child's maternal grandparent as the guardian of the child because the court considered the testimony of the status of the child's circumstances and made a determination regarding the child's best interest.Smith v. Lovelace, 2014 Ark. App. 345 (2014).

A child's grandparents, rather than her putative father, were properly appointed as guardians where, inter alia, (1) the grandparents owned their own home and were gainfully employed, (2) a home study established that their home was suitable and desirable and that they possessed the ability to care for the instant and future welfare and happiness of the child, and (3) they had contributed continual financial support to both the child and her mother, including the payment of prenatal care, cost of the birth, and hospital bills, whereas (4) the putative father was “in transition,” as he had only been employed at his current job for one week prior to the hearing and did not have a home of his own, (5) there was no credible evidence to support his testimony that he had provided support for the child all of her life, and (6) there was credible evidence detailing his physical abuse of the child's mother, even while she was seven or eight months pregnant with the child. Blunt v. Cartwright, 342 Ark. 662, 30 S.W.3d 737 (2000).

Denial of paternal grandmother's petition for guardianship was affirmed as the grandmother was unsuitable because she had been dishonest with the court. Bailey v. Maxwell, 94 Ark. App. 358, 230 S.W.3d 282 (2006).

In a guardianship case that awarded permanent guardianship to the grandparents, the mother took significant action towards rectifying any issues that would keep her from retaining custody of her son, including (1) maintaining a neat, clean, and appropriately furnished home; (2) taking steps to remedy most of the absence and tardiness issues by applying to an elementary school closer to her home and no longer working nights; (3) immediately and permanently removing wall art that could be deemed inappropriate and were an issue regarding her ability to care for her son; and (4) decreasing her Internet presence by removing most of the pictures of her from the offending websites; those were the very types of improvements that parents were encouraged to make in the best interests of their child, and the mother should not be disparaged for her efforts to improve her home and her parenting skills. Thus, it was not in the child's best interests to take custody from the mother, who had rectified all issues related to her fitness, and grant custody to the child's grandparents; therefore, the circuit court clearly erred in removing the child from the mother's care and granting permanent guardianship to the grandparents.Devine v. Martens, 371 Ark. 60, 263 S.W.3d 515 (2007), overruled, Fletcher v. Scorza, 2010 Ark. 64, 359 S.W.3d 413 (2010).

Where maternal grandparents were appointed guardians of their grandson after the mother's death, the father's petition to terminate the guardianship was properly denied because (1) some of the father's testimony was found to be not credible and the father had a smoking habit and a previous domestic-battery incident, and (2) the statutory natural-parent preference under §28-65-204(a) was subservient to the best interest of the child.Smith v. Thomas, 373 Ark. 427, 284 S.W.3d 476 (2008).

Order appointing appellee guardian of the minor child was affirmed because, in guardianship matters, the natural-parent preference was but one consideration, which was subservient to the principle that the child's best interest was the paramount consideration; the circuit court was in a superior position to weigh and assess the credibility of witnesses,Fletcher v. Scorza, 2010 Ark. 64, 359 S.W.3d 413 (2010), rehearing denied, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Ark. LEXIS 170 (Mar. 18, 2010).

Trial court properly found it was in a child's best interests to appoint a paternal aunt and uncle as guardians, in accordance with this section, rather than the maternal grandfather, because even though both parties satisfied the preferential status under §28-65-204(b)(4), any preferential status was subservient to the best interests analysis performed by the trial court; although the father was not qualified to be the guardian, the father wanted the child placed with the aunt and uncle.Smith v. Lovelace, 2011 Ark. App. 74, 380 S.W.3d 514 (2011), rehearing denied, — Ark. App. —, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Ark. App. LEXIS 221 (Mar. 16, 2011), review denied, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Ark. LEXIS 402 (Ark. Apr. 7, 2011).

Order appointing the mother's aunt and uncle guardian of the minor child was proper because the father's parents did not have standing to argue that the trial court erred in denying the father's motion to vacate; a U.S. Const. Amend. VI right to counsel was not cognizable in ordinary civil cases; §28-65-207(a)(3) provided that notice need not be given to any person who actually appeared at the hearing; and there was no evidence that the trial court ignored the father's wishes, §28-65-204(b).Light v. Duvall, 2011 Ark. App. 535, 385 S.W.3d 399 (2011).

Denial of the aunt and uncle's petition for guardianship over the minor children was improper because the children would be required to primarily reside in the same residence with a man who pled guilty to inflicting severe burns on the younger of them, and with their mother who, at the very least, did nothing to prevent the abuse despite evidence that other instances of abuse had occurred.Gammill v. Hoover, 2011 Ark. App. 788 (2011).

Aunt was properly appointed as the guardian of two children under this section where it was in the best interest of the children in order to protect them from the effects of their mother's abusive relationship, and the aunt was qualified and suitable to act as the guardian. Even though the mother had ended the relationship and completed classes and counseling, the natural-parent preference was merely one facet of the case, and the mother was unable to provide for the emotional needs of the children.Gantt v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2013 Ark. App. 217 (2013).

Evidence showed a long-standing and positive relationship between the child and the couple, who had spent quality time with the child for years, and a strong bond existed between them; the mother took little action to establish her fitness to parent the child, the circuit court's best-interest finding was not clearly erroneous, and the three statutory requirements for guardianship had been met in this case.Little v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2016 Ark. App. 362, 499 S.W.3d 233 (2016).

Notwithstanding the contentions of a child's grandparents that appellee failed to establish that she was qualified or suitable to act as the child's guardian, the appellate court concluded there was ample evidence before the circuit court that appellee was qualified and suitable to serve as guardian. The circuit court's finding that appellee would be the better person to parent the child was supported, and the appellate court was not left with a definite and firm conviction that a mistake had been made.Brewer v. Bair-Massey (In re A.B.), 2018 Ark. App. 529, 562 S.W.3d 891 (2018).

Circuit court properly awarded the grandmother's petition for guardianship because it did not clearly err in finding that the grandmother was a suitable guardian; the circuit court's findings that the father did not abuse his children and that the mother coached the children to say he did were not clearly erroneous because all of the investigations of the alleged abuse established that the mother's allegations were unsubstantiated.Mossholder v. Coker, 2017 Ark. App. 279, 521 S.W.3d 150 (2017).

Circuit court properly awarded the grandmother's petition for guardianship because the grandmother was not required to prove that the mother was unfit; there was a large mountain of evidence presented in the case to demonstrate that the mother was unsuitable, and the circuit court found that the mother poisoned the minds of the children and coached them to make untrue statements.Mossholder v. Coker, 2017 Ark. App. 279, 521 S.W.3d 150 (2017).

In a hearing on a petition to appoint a guardian for one alleged to be incompetent for other reasons than minority, the evidence had to include the oral testimony or sworn statement of at least one medical witness. Sparks v. First Nat'l Bank, 242 Ark. 435, 413 S.W.2d 865 (1967) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Moore v. Sipes, 85 Ark. App. 15, 146 S.W.3d 903 (2004); Freeman v. Rushton, 360 Ark. 445, 202 S.W.3d 485 (2005); Troeskyn v. Herrington (In re S.H.), 2012 Ark. 245, 409 S.W.3d 307 (2012).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-833.